New York, session 2025-2026, A3049.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The penal law is amended by adding a new section 260.09 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 260.09 Endangering the welfare of a child in the first degree. 4 A person is guilty of endangering the welfare of a child in the first 5 degree when: 6 1. such person knowingly or recklessly acts in a manner which creates 7 a risk of either serious physical injury or protracted impairment of the 8 physical, mental or moral welfare of a child less than seventeen years 9 old; or 10 2. such person commits the crime of endangering the welfare of a child 11 in the second degree, and: 12 a. being eighteen years old or more such person knowingly or reckless- 13 ly acts in a manner likely to be injurious to the physical, mental or 14 moral welfare of a child less than seven years old and causes physical 15 injury to that child, or 16 b. such person has previously been convicted of a crime or an attempt 17 to commit a crime pursuant to the provisions of articles 120, 121, 125, 18 130, 135, 150, 160, 230, 235, 260 and 263 of the penal law or section 19 155.40, 155.42, 215.00, 215.10, 215.15, 215.16, 215.17, 215.50, 215.51, 20 215.52, 220.28, 220.31, 220.34, 220.39, 220.41, 220.43, 220.44, 220.48, 21 240.75, 245.00, 245.03, 245.11, 250.45, 250.50, 250.55, 250.60, 255.25, 22 255.26, 255.27, 265.01-a, subdivision two of section 265.01, subdivision 23 one of section 265.02, subdivision one of section 265.03, subdivision EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04366-01-5 A. 3049 2 1 one of section 265.04, subdivision five of section 265.10, subdivision 2 one of section 265.11, 265.12, 265.13, 265.14, 265.16, 265.17, or 265.26 3 of the penal law and the victim of the crime was less than seventeen 4 years old or if there was more than one victim at least one of the 5 victims was less than seventeen years old. 6 Endangering the welfare of a child in the first degree is a class E 7 felony. 8 § 2. Section 260.10 of the penal law, as amended by chapter 447 of the 9 laws of 2010, is amended to read as follows: 10 § 260.10 Endangering the welfare of a child in the second degree. 11 A person is guilty of endangering the welfare of a child in the second 12 degree when: 13 1. [He or she] Such person knowingly acts in a manner likely to be 14 injurious to the physical, mental or moral welfare of a child less than 15 seventeen years old or directs or authorizes such child to engage in an 16 occupation involving a substantial risk of danger to [his or her] such 17 child's life or health; or 18 2. Being a parent, guardian or other person legally charged with the 19 care or custody of a child less than eighteen years old, [he or she] 20 such person fails or refuses to exercise reasonable diligence in the 21 control of such child to prevent [him or her] such child from becoming 22 an "abused child," a "neglected child," a "juvenile delinquent" or a 23 "person in need of supervision," as those terms are defined in articles 24 ten, three and seven of the family court act. 25 3. A person is not guilty of the provisions of this section when [he 26 or she] such person engages in the conduct described in subdivision one 27 of section 260.00 of this article: (a) with the intent to wholly abandon 28 the child by relinquishing responsibility for and right to the care and 29 custody of such child; (b) with the intent that the child be safe from 30 physical injury and cared for in an appropriate manner; (c) the child is 31 left with an appropriate person, or in a suitable location and the 32 person who leaves the child promptly notifies an appropriate person of 33 the child's location; and (d) the child is not more than thirty days 34 old. 35 Endangering the welfare of a child in the second degree is a class A 36 misdemeanor. 37 § 3. Paragraph c of subdivision 5 of section 120.40 of the penal law, 38 as amended by section 7 of part NN of chapter 55 of the laws of 2018, is 39 amended to read as follows: 40 c. assault in the third degree, as defined in section 120.00; menacing 41 in the first degree, as defined in section 120.13; menacing in the 42 second degree, as defined in section 120.14; coercion in the first 43 degree, as defined in section 135.65; coercion in the second degree, as 44 defined in section 135.61; coercion in the third degree, as defined in 45 section 135.60; aggravated harassment in the second degree, as defined 46 in section 240.30; harassment in the first degree, as defined in section 47 240.25; menacing in the third degree, as defined in section 120.15; 48 criminal mischief in the third degree, as defined in section 145.05; 49 criminal mischief in the second degree, as defined in section 145.10, 50 criminal mischief in the first degree, as defined in section 145.12; 51 criminal tampering in the first degree, as defined in section 145.20; 52 arson in the fourth degree, as defined in section 150.05; arson in the 53 third degree, as defined in section 150.10; criminal contempt in the 54 first degree, as defined in section 215.51; endangering the welfare of a 55 child in the first degree, as defined in section 260.09; endangering the A. 3049 3 1 welfare of a child in the second degree, as defined in section 260.10; 2 or 3 § 4. Section 260.15 of the penal law, as amended by chapter 447 of the 4 laws of 2010, is amended to read as follows: 5 § 260.15 Endangering the welfare of a child; defense. 6 In any prosecution for endangering the welfare of a child, pursuant to 7 section 260.09 or section 260.10 of this article, based upon an alleged 8 failure or refusal to provide proper medical care or treatment to an ill 9 child, it is an affirmative defense that the defendant (a) is a parent, 10 guardian or other person legally charged with the care or custody of 11 such child; and (b) is a member or adherent of an organized church or 12 religious group the tenets of which prescribe prayer as the principal 13 treatment for illness; and (c) treated or caused such ill child to be 14 treated in accordance with such tenets. 15 § 5. Paragraph (c) of subdivision 4 of section 509-cc of the vehicle 16 and traffic law, as amended by chapter 92 of the laws of 2021, is 17 amended to read as follows: 18 (c) The offenses referred to in subparagraph (i) of paragraph (b) of 19 subdivision one and subparagraph (i) of paragraph (c) of subdivision two 20 of this section that result in disqualification for a period of five 21 years shall include a conviction under sections 100.10, 105.13, 115.05, 22 120.03, 120.04, 120.04-a, 120.05, 120.10, 120.25, 121.12, 121.13, 23 [125.40, 125.45,] 130.20, 130.25, 130.52, 130.55, 135.10, 135.55, 24 140.17, 140.25, 140.30, 145.12, 150.10, 150.15, 160.05, 160.10, 220.06, 25 220.09, 220.16, 220.31, 220.34, 220.60, 220.65, subdivision two of 26 section 222.50, subdivision two of section 222.55, 230.00, 230.05, 27 230.06, 230.11, 230.12, 230.13, 230.19, 230.20, 235.05, 235.06, 235.07, 28 235.21, 240.06, 245.00, 260.09, 260.10, subdivision two of section 29 260.20 and sections 260.25, 265.02, 265.03, 265.08, 265.09, 265.10, 30 265.12, 265.35 of the penal law or an attempt to commit any of the afor- 31 esaid offenses under section 110.00 of the penal law, or any similar 32 offenses committed under a former section of the penal law, or any 33 offenses committed under a former section of the penal law which would 34 constitute violations of the aforesaid sections of the penal law, or any 35 offenses committed outside this state which would constitute violations 36 of the aforesaid sections of the penal law. 37 § 6. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 38 it shall have become a law.